Illinois, session 104th, SB2060.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.6 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.6)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)8    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 9searches. 10    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 11misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 12perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 13of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 14expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 15have been requested to appear at a meeting of the board, or 16with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss their 17child's behavior. Such request shall be made by registered or 18certified mail and shall state the time, place and purpose of 19the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer appointed by it, 20at such meeting shall state the reasons for dismissal and the 21date on which the expulsion is to become effective. If a 22hearing officer is appointed by the board, the hearing officer 23shall report to the board a written summary of the evidence   SB2060- 2 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1heard at the meeting and the board may take such action thereon 2as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to expel a student, 3the written expulsion decision shall detail the specific 4reasons why removing the student from the learning environment 5is in the best interest of the school. The expulsion decision 6shall also include a rationale as to the specific duration of 7the expulsion. An expelled student may be immediately 8transferred to an alternative program in the manner provided 9in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A student must not be 10denied transfer because of the expulsion, except in cases in 11which such transfer is deemed to cause a threat to the safety 12of students or staff in the alternative program. Nothing in 13this subsection (a) precludes a suspension under subsection 14(b). 15    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 16superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 17principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 18students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 19suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 20the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 21subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 22shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 23policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 24principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 25school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 26to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to   SB2060- 3 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 2may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 3reasons. 4    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 5parents or guardian of a student along with a full statement of 6the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right to 7a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 8notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 9suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardian, 10the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 11review such action of the superintendent or principal, 12assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 13parents or guardian of the student may appear and discuss the 14suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 15officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 16a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 17its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 18hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 19appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 20subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 21decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 22misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 23suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 24specific duration of the suspension.25    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 26and consequences available to school officials, school   SB2060- 4 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 2are the most serious and should only be used when the student's 3presence poses a threat to the operation of the school, poses a 4threat to the health or safety of students or school 5personnel, or causes a disruption to other students' learning 6opportunities. School officials shall limit the number and 7duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest extent 8practicable, and it is recommended that they use them only for 9legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that students are 10not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is recommended that 11school officials consider implementing proactive 12evidence-based interventions, as defined in subsection (d) of 13Section 10-20.14, that improve behavioral outcomes for all 14students. In addition, it is recommended that school officials 15consider forms of non-exclusionary discipline, if appropriate, 16prior to using out-of-school suspensions or expulsions. Forms 17of non-exclusionary discipline include, but are not limited 18to, in-school suspensions that allow students to continue 19academic instruction in an alternative environment, 20restorative practices, and small-group instruction on behavior 21management strategies. 22    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 23Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 24by which school administrators are required to suspend or 25expel students for particular behaviors.26    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be   SB2060- 5 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1used only if the student's conduct poses a threat to the 2operation of the school, poses a threat to the health or safety 3of students or school personnel, continuing presence in school 4would pose a threat to school safety or causes a disruption to 5other students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 6subsection (b-15), the school board or its designee shall be 7solely responsible for determining, "threat to school safety 8or a disruption to other students' learning opportunities" 9shall be determined on a case-by-case basis, whether the 10student's conduct poses a threat to the operation of the 11school, poses a threat to the health or safety of students or 12school personnel, or causes a disruption to other students' 13learning opportunities by the school board or its designee. 14School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 15such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 16length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.17    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 18out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 19and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 20only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 21disciplinary interventions have been attempted exhausted and 22the student's conduct poses a threat to the school, poses a 23threat to the health or safety of students or school 24personnel, or causes a disruption to other students' learning 25opportunities continuing presence in school would either (i) 26pose a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or   SB2060- 6 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1members of the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, 2impede, or interfere with the operation of the school. For 3purposes of this subsection (b-20), the determination of 4whether the student's conduct poses a threat to the operation 5of the school, poses a threat to the health or safety of 6students or school personnel, or causes a disruption to other 7students' learning opportunities "threat to the safety of 8other students, staff, or members of the school community" and 9"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 10operation of the school" shall be made determined on a 11case-by-case basis and solely by school officials. For 12purposes of this subsection (b-20), the determination of 13whether "appropriate and available behavioral and disciplinary 14interventions have been attempted exhausted" shall be made by 15school authorities officials. School officials shall make all 16reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, address such 17disruptions, and minimize the length of student exclusions to 18the greatest extent practicable. Within the suspension 19decision described in subsection (b) of this Section or the 20expulsion decision described in subsection (a) of this 21Section, it shall be documented whether other interventions 22were attempted or whether it was determined that there were no 23other appropriate and available interventions.24    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 25than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 26support services during the period of their suspension. For   SB2060- 7 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 2support services" shall be determined solely by school 3authorities. Within the suspension decision described in 4subsection (b) of this Section, it shall be documented whether 5such services are to be provided or whether it was determined 6that there are no such appropriate and available services. 7    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 8appropriate and available support services.9    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 10re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 11expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 12consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 13Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 14and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 15suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 16alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 17Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 18    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 19suspended students, including those students suspended from 20the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 21school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 22equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 23a student's parent or guardian to notify school officials that 24a student suspended from the school bus does not have 25alternate transportation to school. 26    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a   SB2060- 8 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 2meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 3the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.4    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 5provide ongoing professional development to all school 6personnel, school board members, and school resource officers, 7on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 8adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 9involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 10culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 11environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 12the appropriate and available supportive services for the 13promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 14developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 15positive and healthy school climates. 16    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 17time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 18case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 19brought one of the following objects to school, any 20school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 21that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 22expelled for a period of not less than one year:23        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 24    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 25    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 26    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners   SB2060- 9 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 2    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 3    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 4    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 5    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.6        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 7    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 8    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 9    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 10    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 11    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 12    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 13    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 14Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 15consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 16Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 17expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 18transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 19Article 13A of the School Code.20    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 21superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 22principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 23student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 24a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 25calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 26that student has been determined to have made an explicit   SB2060- 10 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 2student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 3website through which the threat was made is a site that was 4accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 5was available to third parties who worked or studied within 6the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 7the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 8the safety and security of the threatened individual because 9of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 10student inside the school. 11    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 12authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 13lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 14equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 15personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 16without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 17search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 18Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 19privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 20left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 21the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 22conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 23lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 24controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 25illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 26searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs.   SB2060- 11 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 2evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 3the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 4such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 5disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 6turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.7    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 8expulsion from school and all school activities and a 9prohibition from being present on school grounds.10    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 11a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 12public or private school in this or any other state, the 13student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 14expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 15of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 16under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 17school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 18or staff in the alternative program.19    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 20students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 21difficulties.22    (i) A student may not be issued a monetary fine or fee as a 23disciplinary consequence, though this shall not preclude 24requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 25or damaged property.26    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall   SB2060- 12 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 2special charter districts, and school districts organized 3under Article 34 of this Code. 4    (k) The expulsion of students enrolled in programs funded 5under Section 1C-2 of this Code is subject to the requirements 6under paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2-3.71 of 7this Code.8    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 9district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 10focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 11positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 12A school district may employ a school social worker or a 13licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 14suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 15(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 16103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 8-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 17    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)18    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 19searches. 20    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 21misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 22perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 23of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 24expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 25or guardians have been requested to appear at a meeting of the   SB2060- 13 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1board, or with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss 2their child's behavior. Such request shall be made by 3registered or certified mail and shall state the time, place 4and purpose of the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer 5appointed by it, at such meeting shall state the reasons for 6dismissal and the date on which the expulsion is to become 7effective. If a hearing officer is appointed by the board, the 8hearing officer shall report to the board a written summary of 9the evidence heard at the meeting and the board may take such 10action thereon as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to 11expel a student, the written expulsion decision shall detail 12the specific reasons why removing the student from the 13learning environment is in the best interest of the school. 14The expulsion decision shall also include a rationale as to 15the specific duration of the expulsion. An expelled student 16may be immediately transferred to an alternative program in 17the manner provided in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A 18student must not be denied transfer because of the expulsion, 19except in cases in which such transfer is deemed to cause a 20threat to the safety of students or staff in the alternative 21program. Nothing in this subsection (a) precludes a suspension 22under subsection (b). 23    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 24superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 25principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 26students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to   SB2060- 14 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 2the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 3subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 4shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 5policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 6principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 7school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 8to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 9gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 10may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 11reasons. 12    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 13parents or guardians of a student along with a full statement 14of the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right 15to a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 16notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 17suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardians, 18the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 19review such action of the superintendent or principal, 20assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 21parents or guardians of the student may appear and discuss the 22suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 23officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 24a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 25its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 26hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds   SB2060- 15 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 2subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 3decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 4misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 5suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 6specific duration of the suspension.7    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 8and consequences available to school officials, school 9exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 10are the most serious and should only be used when the student's 11presence poses a threat to the operation of the school, poses a 12threat to the health or safety of students or school 13personnel, or causes a disruption to other students' learning 14opportunities. School officials shall limit the number and 15duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest extent 16practicable, and it is recommended that they use them only for 17legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that students are 18not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is recommended that 19school officials consider implementing proactive 20evidence-based interventions, as defined in subsection (d) of 21Section 10-20.14, that improve behavioral outcomes for all 22students. In addition, it is recommended that school officials 23consider forms of non-exclusionary discipline, if appropriate, 24prior to using out-of-school suspensions or expulsions. Forms 25of non-exclusionary discipline include, but are not limited 26to, in-school suspensions that allow students to continue   SB2060- 16 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1academic instruction in an alternative environment, 2restorative practices, and small-group instruction on behavior 3management strategies. 4    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 5Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 6by which school administrators are required to suspend or 7expel students for particular behaviors.8    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 9used only if the student's conduct poses a threat to the 10operation of the school, poses a threat to the health or safety 11of students or school personnel, continuing presence in school 12would pose a threat to school safety or causes a disruption to 13other students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 14subsection (b-15), the school board or its designee shall be 15solely responsible for determining, "threat to school safety 16or a disruption to other students' learning opportunities" 17shall be determined on a case-by-case basis, whether the 18student's conduct poses a threat to the operation of the 19school, poses a threat to the health or safety of students or 20school personnel, or causes a disruption to other students' 21learning opportunities by the school board or its designee. 22School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 23such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 24length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.25    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 26out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions,   SB2060- 17 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 2only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 3disciplinary interventions have been attempted exhausted and 4the student's conduct poses a threat to the school, poses a 5threat to the health or safety of students or school 6personnel, or causes a disruption to other students' learning 7opportunities continuing presence in school would either (i) 8pose a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or 9members of the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, 10impede, or interfere with the operation of the school. For 11purposes of this subsection (b-20), the determination of 12whether the student's conduct poses a threat to the operation 13of the school, poses a threat to the health or safety of 14students or school personnel, or causes a disruption to other 15students' learning opportunities "threat to the safety of 16other students, staff, or members of the school community" and 17"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 18operation of the school" shall be made determined on a 19case-by-case basis and solely by school officials. For 20purposes of this subsection (b-20), the determination of 21whether "appropriate and available behavioral and disciplinary 22interventions have been attempted exhausted" shall be made by 23school authorities officials. School officials shall make all 24reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, address such 25disruptions, and minimize the length of student exclusions to 26the greatest extent practicable. Within the suspension   SB2060- 18 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1decision described in subsection (b) of this Section or the 2expulsion decision described in subsection (a) of this 3Section, it shall be documented whether other interventions 4were attempted or whether it was determined that there were no 5other appropriate and available interventions.6    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 7than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 8support services during the period of their suspension. For 9purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 10support services" shall be determined solely by school 11authorities. Within the suspension decision described in 12subsection (b) of this Section, it shall be documented whether 13such services are to be provided or whether it was determined 14that there are no such appropriate and available services. 15    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 16appropriate and available support services.17    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 18re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 19expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 20consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 21Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 22and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 23suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 24alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 25Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 26    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which   SB2060- 19 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1suspended students, including those students suspended from 2the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 3school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 4equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 5a student's parents or guardians to notify school officials 6that a student suspended from the school bus does not have 7alternate transportation to school. 8    (b-35) In all suspension review hearings conducted under 9subsection (b) or expulsion hearings conducted under 10subsection (a), a student may disclose any factor to be 11considered in mitigation, including his or her status as a 12parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 13violence, as defined in Article 26A. A representative of the 14parent's or guardian's choice, or of the student's choice if 15emancipated, must be permitted to represent the student 16throughout the proceedings and to address the school board or 17its appointed hearing officer. With the approval of the 18student's parent or guardian, or of the student if 19emancipated, a support person must be permitted to accompany 20the student to any disciplinary hearings or proceedings. The 21representative or support person must comply with any rules of 22the school district's hearing process. If the representative 23or support person violates the rules or engages in behavior or 24advocacy that harasses, abuses, or intimidates either party, a 25witness, or anyone else in attendance at the hearing, the 26representative or support person may be prohibited from   SB2060- 20 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1further participation in the hearing or proceeding. A 2suspension or expulsion proceeding under this subsection 3(b-35) must be conducted independently from any ongoing 4criminal investigation or proceeding, and an absence of 5pending or possible criminal charges, criminal investigations, 6or proceedings may not be a factor in school disciplinary 7decisions.8    (b-40) During a suspension review hearing conducted under 9subsection (b) or an expulsion hearing conducted under 10subsection (a) that involves allegations of sexual violence by 11the student who is subject to discipline, neither the student 12nor his or her representative shall directly question nor have 13direct contact with the alleged victim. The student who is 14subject to discipline or his or her representative may, at the 15discretion and direction of the school board or its appointed 16hearing officer, suggest questions to be posed by the school 17board or its appointed hearing officer to the alleged victim. 18    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 19local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 20meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 21the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.22    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 23provide ongoing professional development to all school 24personnel, school board members, and school resource officers 25on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 26adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system   SB2060- 21 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 2culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 3environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 4the appropriate and available supportive services for the 5promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 6developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 7positive and healthy school climates. 8    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 9time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 10case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 11brought one of the following objects to school, any 12school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 13that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 14expelled for a period of not less than one year:15        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 16    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 17    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 18    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 19    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 20    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 21    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 22    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 23    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.24        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 25    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 26    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily   SB2060- 22 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 2    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 3    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 4    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 5    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 6Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 7consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 8Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 9expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 10transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 11Article 13A of the School Code.12    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 13superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 14principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 15student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 16a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 17calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 18that student has been determined to have made an explicit 19threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 20student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 21website through which the threat was made is a site that was 22accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 23was available to third parties who worked or studied within 24the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 25the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 26the safety and security of the threatened individual because   SB2060- 23 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 2student inside the school. 3    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 4authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 5lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 6equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 7personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 8without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 9search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 10Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 11privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 12left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 13the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 14conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 15lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 16controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 17illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 18searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 19If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 20evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 21the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 22such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 23disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 24turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.25    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 26expulsion from school and all school activities and a   SB2060- 24 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1prohibition from being present on school grounds.2    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 3a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 4public or private school in this or any other state, the 5student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 6expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 7of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 8under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 9school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 10or staff in the alternative program. A school district that 11adopts a policy under this subsection (g) must include a 12provision allowing for consideration of any mitigating 13factors, including, but not limited to, a student's status as 14a parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 15violence, as defined in Article 26A. 16    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 17students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 18difficulties.19    (i) A student may not be issued a monetary fine or fee as a 20disciplinary consequence, though this shall not preclude 21requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 22or damaged property.23    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 24apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 25special charter districts, and school districts organized 26under Article 34 of this Code.   SB2060- 25 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1    (k) Through June 30, 2026, the expulsion of students 2enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of this Code is 3subject to the requirements under paragraph (7) of subsection 4(a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code.5    (k-5) On and after July 1, 2026, the expulsion of children 6enrolled in programs funded under Section 15-25 of the 7Department of Early Childhood Act is subject to the 8requirements of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 915-30 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. 10    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 11district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 12focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 13positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 14A school district may employ a school social worker or a 15licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 16suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 17(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25; 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 198-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 20    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 21changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 22that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 23represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 24not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 25made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other   SB2060- 26 -LRB104 10662 LNS 20740 b1Public Act.